Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 3. Applications for Licenses and Permits; Fees; Taxes.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10B M.J. Intoxicating Liquors, § 29; 18 M.J. Taxation, § 196.

§ 4.1-230.
Applications for licenses; publication; notice to localities; fees; permits.

Every person intending to apply for any license authorized by this chapter shall file with the Board an application on forms provided by the Board and a statement in writing by the applicant swearing and affirming that all of the information contained therein is true.

Applicants for retail licenses for establishments that serve food or are otherwise required to obtain a food establishment permit from the Department of Health or an inspection by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall provide a copy of such permit, proof of inspection, proof of a pending application for such permit, or proof of a pending request for such inspection. If the applicant provides a copy of such permit, proof of inspection, proof of a pending application for a permit, or proof of a pending request for an inspection, a license may be issued to the applicant. If a license is issued on the basis of a pending application or inspection, such license shall authorize the licensee to purchase alcoholic beverages in accordance with the provisions of this subtitle; however, the licensee shall not sell or serve alcoholic beverages until a permit is issued or an inspection is completed.

In addition, each applicant for a license under the provisions of this chapter, except applicants for annual banquet, banquet, tasting, special events, club events, annual mixed beverage banquet, wine and beer shipper’s, delivery permit, annual arts venue, or museum licenses issued under the provisions of Chapter 2 (§

4.1-200

et seq.), or beer or wine importer’s licenses, shall post a notice of his application with the Board on the front door of the building, place, or room where he proposes to engage in such business for no more than 30 days and not less than 10 days. Such notice shall be of a size and contain such information as required by the Board, including a statement that any objections shall be submitted to the Board not more than 30 days following initial publication of the notice required pursuant to this subsection.

The applicant shall also cause notice to be published at least once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in or having a general circulation in the county, city, or town wherein such applicant proposes to engage in such business. Such notice shall contain such information as required by the Board, including a statement that any objections to the issuance of the license be submitted to the Board not later than 30 days from the date of the initial newspaper publication. In the case of wine and beer shipper’s licensees, third-party delivery licensees, delivery permittees, or operators of boats, dining cars, buffet cars, club cars, buses, and airplanes, the posting and publishing of notice shall not be required.

Except for applicants for annual banquet, banquet, tasting, mixed beverage special events, club events, annual mixed beverage banquet, wine and beer shipper’s, beer or wine importer’s, annual arts venue, or museum licenses, the Board shall conduct a background investigation, to include a criminal history records search, which may include a fingerprint-based national criminal history records search, on each applicant for a license. However, the Board may waive, for good cause shown, the requirement for a criminal history records search and completed personal data form for officers, directors, nonmanaging members, or limited partners of any applicant corporation, limited liability company, or limited partnership.

Except for applicants for wine and beer shipper’s licenses and delivery permits, the Board shall notify the local governing body of each license application through the county or city attorney or the chief law-enforcement or administrative officer of the locality. Local governing bodies shall submit objections to the granting of a license within 30 days of the filing of the application.

Each applicant shall pay the required application fee at the time the application is filed. Each license application fee, including annual banquet and annual mixed beverage banquet, shall be $195, plus the actual cost charged to the Department of State Police by the Federal Bureau of Investigation or the Central Criminal Records Exchange for processing any fingerprints through the Federal Bureau of Investigation or the Central Criminal Records Exchange for each criminal history records search required by the Board, except for banquet, tasting, or mixed beverage club events licenses, in which case the application fee shall be $15. The application fee for banquet special event and mixed beverage special event licenses shall be $45. Application fees shall be in addition to the state license fee required pursuant to §

4.1-231.1

and shall not be refunded.

Subsection A shall not apply to the continuance of licenses granted under this chapter; however, all licensees shall file and maintain with the Board a current, accurate record of the information required by the Board pursuant to subsection A and notify the Board of any changes to such information in accordance with Board regulations.

Every application for a permit granted pursuant to §

4.1-212

shall be on a form provided by the Board. Such permits shall confer upon their holders no authority to make solicitations in the Commonwealth as otherwise provided by law.

The fee for a temporary permit shall be one-twelfth of the combined fees required by this section for applicable licenses to sell wine, beer, or mixed beverages computed to the nearest cent and multiplied by the number of months for which the permit is granted.

The Board shall have the authority to increase state license fees from the amounts set forth in §

4.1-231.1

as it was in effect on January 1, 2022. The Board shall set the amount of such increases on the basis of the consumer price index and shall not increase fees more than once every three years. Prior to implementing any state license fee increase, the Board shall provide notice to all licensees and the general public of (i) the Board’s intent to impose a fee increase and (ii) the new fee that would be required for any license affected by the Board’s proposed fee increases. Such notice shall be provided on or before November 1 in any year in which the Board has decided to increase state license fees, and such increases shall become effective July 1 of the following year.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 4-26, 4-30, 4-31, 4-33; 1952, c. 535; 1954, cc. 301, 351; 1956, c. 523; 1960, c. 476; 1968, c. 7, § 4-98.16; 1970, c. 627; 1972, cc. 178, 717; 1974, c. 267; 1975, c. 408; 1976, cc. 67, 496, 696, 698; 1978, cc. 190, 446; 1980, cc. 299, 324, 524, 526, § 4-25.1; 1981, c. 410; 1982, cc. 66, 527; 1984, cc. 53, 180, 200, 559, 703; 1985, c. 457; 1986, cc. 94, 190, 615; 1988, c. 786; 1989, c. 311; 1990, cc. 108, 300, 390, 442, 707, 727, 810; 1991, c. 425; 1992, c. 350; 1993, cc. 166, 866; 1994, c. 825; 1996, cc. 584, 596; 1998, c. 535; 1999, cc. 112, 756; 2003, cc. 1029, 1030; 2004, cc. 382, 487; 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4; 2005, cc. 361, 951; 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2; 2007, cc. 99, 799; 2008, c. 765; 2011, c. 65; 2015, c. 412; 2017, c. 596; 2018, cc. 405, 406, 657; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 82, 186; 2022, cc. 78, 79.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 166 amended former § 4-30, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152, the
1993 amendment by c. 166 has been given effect in this section as set out above. Pursuant to c. 166, subsections A and B were rewritten.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 4 provides: “That subsection A of
§

4.1-231.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire when the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) provides notice to the Division of Legislative Services that the Board has increased state license fees in accordance with the provisions of subsection F of
§

4.1-230

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 8, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That on or after July 1, 2020, the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may issue mixed beverage carrier licenses to persons operating a common carrier of passengers by bus, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages anywhere in the Commonwealth to passengers while in transit aboard any such common carrier. The state license fee for any such license granted prior to January 1, 2022, shall be $190. Such license shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license. For the purposes of this enactment, ‘bus’ means a motor vehicle that (i) is operated by a common carrier licensed under Chapter 20 ( §

46.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 46.2 of the Code of Virginia to transport passengers for compensation over the highways of the Commonwealth on regular or irregular routes of not less than 100 miles, (ii) seats no more than 24 passengers, (iii) is 40 feet in length or longer, (iv) offers wireless Internet services, (v) is equipped with charging stations at every seat for cellular phones or other portable devices, and (vi) during the transportation of passengers, is staffed by an attendant who has satisfied all training requirements set forth in Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia or Board regulation.”

Acts
2022, cc. 78 and
79, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority shall collect data regarding the compliance of third-party delivery licensees with the provisions of this act and report such data to the Chairmen of the House Committee on General Laws and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services by November 1, 2023.”

Acts
2022, cc. 78 and
79, cl. 4 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) shall monitor the implementation of the provisions of this act to identify any difficulties of third-party delivery licensees in determining locations to which alcoholic beverages may be delivered and the adequacy of applicable training and education programs. The Board of Directors of the Authority shall promulgate regulations, if necessary, to address any issues identified during such monitoring process.”

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection A, in the second sentence, deleted “or” preceding “mixed beverage” and inserted “or club events”; in subsection B, in the first paragraph, in the first sentence,
deleted “or” preceding “special events” and inserted “or club events,” in the third paragraph, deleted “or” preceding “mixed beverage” and inserted “or club events”; and in subsection C, in the second sentence, deleted “or” preceding “mixed beverage special” and inserted “or mixed beverage club events.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 112 inserted “plus $15 for each criminal history records search required by the Board” in subsection C, in the second sentence.

The 1999 amendment by c. 756, in the first and third paragraphs of subsection B, deleted “or” following “special events,” and inserted “or museum.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 1029 and 1030 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “10” for “ten” and “30” for “thirty,” inserted “wine or beer shipper’s, wine and beer shipper’s” in the first sentence of the first paragraph, and “wine or beer shipper’s licensees, wine and beer shipper’s licensees” in the last sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 382, in subsection B, inserted “wine or beer shipper’s, wine and beer shipper’s” in the third paragraph and added “Except for applicants for wine shipper’s, beer shipper’s, and wine and beer shipper’s licenses” at the beginning of the first sentence in the last paragraph.

The 2004 amendment by c. 487, in subsection B, inserted “annual banquet” and “annual mixed beverage banquet” in the first sentence of the first paragraph and in the next-to-last paragraph; and inserted “including annual banquet and annual mixed beverage banquet” in the second sentence of subsection C.

The 2004 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, as amended by Acts 2005, c. 951, and Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, effective July 1, 2004, in subsection C, substituted “$65” for “$15” in the first sentence, and substituted “fee” for “tax” in the second sentence; in subsection E, substituted “$165” for “$125” and “$300” for “390” in the first paragraph, substituted “$65” for “$50” in the third paragraph, and substituted “$260” for “$200” in the fourth paragraph.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 361 added the last sentence in the third paragraph of subsection B.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 99 and 732 are nearly identical, and in subsection B, inserted “delivery permit” in the first sentence of the first paragraph, inserted “delivery permittees” in the last sentence of the second paragraph and in the last paragraph, inserted “and delivery permits” and made a related change in the first sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 765 inserted “which may include a fingerprint-based national criminal history records search” in the first sentence in the third paragraph of subsection B; and in subsection C, deleted “$20” following “$65, plus” and inserted “the actual cost charged to the Department of State Police by the Federal Bureau of Investigation or the Central Criminal Records Exchange for processing any fingerprints through the Federal Bureau of Investigation or the Central Criminal Records Exchange” near the middle.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 65, in subsection B, in the first paragraph, added “including a statement that any objections shall be submitted to the Board not more than 30 days following initial publication of the notice required pursuant to this subsection” at the end, and in the second paragraph, substituted “shall also cause notice to be published” for “shall cause a copy of such notice to be published” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 412 in subsection B, in the first paragraph, inserted “annual arts venue,” deleted “of this title” following “(§

4.1-200

et seq.)” and “located outside the Commonwealth” following “importer’s licenses” in the first sentence and in the third paragraph, inserted “beer or wine importer’s, annual arts venue”; and added “however, all licensees shall file and maintain with the Board a current, accurate record of the information required by the Board pursuant to subsection A and notify the Board of any changes to such information in accordance with Board regulations” at the end of subsection D.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 596 added the second paragraph in subsection A.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 405 and 406 are identical, and in subsection C, substituted “$195” for “$65” and deleted “mixed beverage special events” following “banquet, tasting” in the second sentence and inserted the third sentence.

The 2018 amendment by c. 657 substituted “by the applicant swearing and affirming that all of the information contained therein is true” for “under oath, setting forth any information required by the Board. Applications for banquet, tasting, mixed beverage special events, or club events licenses shall not be required to be under oath, but the information contained therein shall be certified as true by the applicant” in the first paragraph of subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subsection B, first and third paragraphs, deleted “wine or beer shipper’s” following “annual mixed beverage banquet” in the first sentence; in the second paragraph, last sentence, deleted “wine or beer shipper’s licensees” following “In the case of” and inserted “buses”; in the fourth paragraph, deleted “wine shipper’s, beer shipper’s” following “Except for applicants for”; substituted §

4.1-231.1

” for “§

4.1-231

” near the of subsection C; in subsection E, first paragraph, deleted the second through fourth sentences, which read: “In the case of applications to solicit the sale of wine and beer or spirits, each application shall be accompanied by a fee of $165 and $390, respectively. The fee for each such permit shall be subject to proration to the following extent: If the permit is granted in the second quarter of any year, the fee shall be decreased by one-fourth; if granted in the third quarter of any year, the fee shall be decreased by one-half; and if granted in the fourth quarter of any year, the fee shall be decreased by three-fourths. Each such permit shall expire on June 30 next succeeding the date of issuance, unless sooner suspended or revoked by the Board”; and deleted the third and fourth paragraphs, which read “The fee for a keg registration permit shall be $65 annually. The fee for a permit for the storage of lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages not under customs bond or internal revenue bond in warehouses located in the Commonwealth shall be $260 annually”; added subsection F and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, effective March 11, 2021, in the version of the section effective January 1, 2022, substituted “January 1, 2022” for “July 1, 2021” at the end of the first sentence in subsection F.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 186, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “chief law-enforcement or administrative officer” for “chief law-enforcement officer” in the last paragraph of subsection B.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 78 and 79 are identical, and inserted “third-party delivery licensees” in subsection B in the second paragraph.

§ 4.1-231.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 1113 and 1114, cl. 2, effective January 1, 2022.

History.

Former §

4.1-231

, relating to taxes on state licenses, was derived from Code 1950, § 4-33; 1952, c. 535; 1960, c. 476; 1968, c. 609, § 4-98.18; 1970, c. 627; 1972, cc. 691, 717; 1974, c. 267; 1975, cc. 2, 483; 1976, c. 496; 1978, cc. 153, 190; 1979, c. 366; 1980, cc. 324, 524, 526, § 4-25.1; 1981, c. 410; 1982, cc. 66, 527; 1984, cc. 180, 200, 559; 1985, c. 457; 1986, cc. 190, 374; 1990, cc. 300, 390, 707, 810; 1991, c. 425; 1992, cc. 162, 350; 1993, c. 866; 1995, cc. 497, 518; 1996, cc. 584, 596, 604; 1998, cc. 489, 535; 1999, c. 325; 2000, cc. 1036, 1037, 1047, 1051, 1052; 2001, cc. 461, 845; 2003, cc. 1029, 1030; 2004, c. 487; 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4; 2005, cc. 784, 911, 951; 2006, cc. 737, 845; 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2; 2007, cc. 99, 101, 107, 295, 558, 799, 870, 932; 2008, c. 198; 2010, cc. 317, 561; 2011, cc. 6, 626; 2012, cc. 203, 237; 2013, c. 479; 2014, cc. 510, 637; 2015, cc. 348, 412, 695; 2017, cc. 152, 157, 159, 492; 2018, cc. 173, 334, 337, 405, 406; 2019, cc. 622, 628; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 390, 391.

Cross references.

For current provisions related to fees on state licenses, see §

4.1-231.1

.

§ 4.1-231.1.
Fees on state licenses.

(Contingent expiration date) The annual fees on state licenses shall be as follows:

Manufacturer licenses. For each:

Distiller’s license and limited distiller’s license, if not more than 5,000 gallons of alcohol or spirits, or both, manufactured during the year in which the license is granted, $490; if more than 5,000 gallons but not more than 36,000 gallons manufactured during such year, $2,725; and if more than 36,000 gallons manufactured during such year, $4,060;

Brewery license and limited brewery license, if not more than 500 barrels of beer manufactured during the year in which the license is granted, $380; if not more than 10,000 barrels of beer manufactured during the year in which the license is granted, $2,350; and if more than 10,000 barrels manufactured during such year, $4,690;

Winery license, if not more than 5,000 gallons of wine manufactured during the year in which the license is granted, $215, and if more than 5,000 gallons manufactured during such year, $4,210;

Farm winery license, $245 for any Class A license and $4,730 for any Class B license;

Wine importer’s license, $460; and

Beer importer’s license, $460.

Wholesale licenses. For each:

Wholesale beer license, $1,005 for any wholesaler who sells 300,000 cases of beer a year or less, $1,545 for any wholesaler who sells more than 300,000 but not more than 600,000 cases of beer a year, and $2,010 for any wholesaler who sells more than 600,000 cases of beer a year; and

Wholesale beer license applicable to two or more premises, the annual state license tax shall be the amount set forth in subdivision a (1), multiplied by the number of separate locations covered by the license;

Wholesale wine license, $240 for any wholesaler who sells 30,000 gallons of wine or less per year, $1,200 for any wholesaler who sells more than 30,000 gallons per year but not more than 150,000 gallons of wine per year, $1,845 for any wholesaler who sells more than 150,000 but not more than 300,000 gallons of wine per year, and $2,400 for any wholesaler who sells more than 300,000 gallons of wine per year; and

Wholesale wine license, including that granted pursuant to subdivision 3 of §

4.1-206.2

, applicable to two or more premises, the annual state license tax shall be the amount set forth in subdivision b (1), multiplied by the number of separate locations covered by the license.

With a seating capacity at tables for more than 150 persons but not more than 500 persons, $1,980;

With a seating capacity at tables for more than 500 persons but not more than 1,000 persons, $2,500; and

With a seating capacity at tables for more than 1,000 persons, $3,100;

Annual arts venue event license, $300.

Retail licenses — mixed beverage. For each:

Mixed beverage restaurant license, granted to persons operating restaurants, including restaurants located on premises of and operated by casinos, hotels or motels, or other persons:

Mixed beverage restaurant license for restaurants located on the premises of and operated by private, nonprofit clubs:

Mixed beverage casino license, $3,100 plus an additional $5 for each gaming station located on the premises of the casino gaming establishment. For the purposes of this subdivision, “gaming station” means each slot machine and each casino gaming table that is in active use, as determined annually on December 31;

Mixed beverage caterer’s license, $1,990;

Mixed beverage limited caterer’s license, $550;

Mixed beverage carrier license:

Annual mixed beverage motor sports facility license, $630;

Limited mixed beverage restaurant license:

Annual mixed beverage performing arts facility license, $630;

Bed and breakfast license, $100;

Museum license, $260;

Motor car sporting event facility license, $300;

Commercial lifestyle center license, $300;

Mixed beverage port restaurant license, $1,050; and

Annual mixed beverage special events license, $630.

Retail licenses — on-and-off-premises wine and beer. For each on-and-off premises wine and beer license, $450.

Retail licenses — off-premises wine and beer. For each:

Retail off-premises wine and beer license, $300;

Gourmet brewing shop license, $320; and

Confectionery license, $170.

Retail licenses — banquet, special event, and tasting licenses.

Per-day event licenses. For each:

Annual licenses. For each:

Retail licenses — marketplace. For each marketplace license, $1,000.

Retail licenses — shipper, bottler, and related licenses. For each:

Wine and beer shipper’s license, $230;

Internet wine and beer retailer license, $240;

Bottler license, $1,500;

Fulfillment warehouse license, $210;

Marketing portal license, $285;

Third-party delivery license, $7,500, unless the licensee provides written certification to the Board that the licensee has no more than 25 delivery personnel, including employees, agents, and independent contractors that engage in direct-to-consumer alcoholic beverage delivery, in which case the license fee shall be $2,500.

Temporary licenses. For each temporary license authorized by §

4.1-211

, one-half of the tax imposed by this section on the license for which the applicant applied.

The tax on each license granted or reissued for a period other than 12, 24, or 36 months shall be equal to one-twelfth of the taxes required by subsection A computed to the nearest cent, multiplied by the number of months in the license period, and then increased by five percent. Such tax shall not be refundable, except as provided in §

4.1-232

.

Nothing in this chapter shall exempt any licensee from any state merchants’ license or state restaurant license or any other state tax. Every licensee, in addition to the taxes imposed by this chapter, shall be liable to state merchants’ license taxation and state restaurant license taxation and other state taxation the same as if the alcoholic beverages were nonalcoholic. In ascertaining the liability of a beer wholesaler to merchants’ license taxation, however, and in computing the wholesale merchants’ license tax on a beer wholesaler, the first $163,800 of beer purchases shall be disregarded; and in ascertaining the liability of a wholesale wine distributor to merchants’ license taxation, and in computing the wholesale merchants’ license tax on a wholesale wine distributor, the first $163,800 of wine purchases shall be disregarded.

In addition to the taxes set forth in this section, a fee of $5 may be imposed on any license purchased in person from the Board if such license is available for purchase online.

(1)

With a seating capacity at tables for up to 100 persons, $1,050;

(2)

With a seating capacity at tables for more than 100 but not more than 150 persons, $1,495;

(1)

With an average yearly membership of not more than 200 resident members, $1,250;

(2)

With an average yearly membership of more than 200 but not more than 500 resident members, $2,440; and

(3)

With an average yearly membership of more than 500 resident members, $3,410;

(1)

$520 for each of the average number of dining cars, buffet cars, or club cars operated daily in the Commonwealth by a common carrier of passengers by train;

(2)

$910 for each common carrier of passengers by boat;

(3)

$520 for each common carrier of passengers by bus; and

(4)

$2,360 for each license granted to a common carrier of passengers by airplane;

(1)

With a seating capacity at tables for up to 100 persons, $945;

(2)

With a seating capacity at tables for more than 100 but not more than 150 persons, $1,385; and

(3)

With a seating capacity at tables for more than 150 persons, $1,875;

(1)

Banquet license, $40 per license granted by the Board, except for banquet licenses granted by the Board pursuant to subsection A of §

4.1-215

, which shall be $100 per license;

(2)

Mixed beverage special events license, $45 for each day of each event;

(3)

Mixed beverage club events license, $35 for each day of each event; and

(4)

Tasting license, $40.

(1)

Annual banquet license, $300;

(2)

Banquet facility license, $260;

(3)

Designated outdoor refreshment area license, $300. However, for any designated outdoor refreshment area license issued pursuant to a local ordinance, the annual fee shall be $3,000;

(4)

Annual mixed beverage banquet license, $630;

(5)

Equine sporting event license, $300; and

History.

2020, cc. 1113, 1114; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 390, 391; 2022, cc. 78, 79, 589, 590.

Expiration date for subsection A.

Acts 2020, cc. 1113 and 1114, cl. 4 provides: “That subsection A of §

4.1-231.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire when the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) provides notice to the Division of Legislative Services that the Board has increased state license fees in accordance with the provisions of subsection F of §

4.1-230

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act.”

Acts
2022, cc. 78 and
79, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority shall collect data regarding the compliance of third-party delivery licensees with the provisions of this act and report such data to the Chairmen of the House Committee on General Laws and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services by November 1, 2023.”

Acts
2022, cc. 78 and
79, cl. 4 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) shall monitor the implementation of the provisions of this act to identify any difficulties of third-party delivery licensees in determining locations to which alcoholic beverages may be delivered and the adequacy of applicable training and education programs. The Board of Directors of the Authority shall promulgate regulations, if necessary, to address any issues identified during such monitoring process.”

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 7 provides: “That any farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery that, prior to July 1, 2016, (i) holds a valid license granted by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) in accordance with Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and (ii) is in compliance with the local zoning ordinance as an agricultural district or classification or as otherwise permitted by a locality for farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery use shall be allowed to continue such use as provided in
§

15.2-2307

of the Code of Virginia, notwithstanding (a) the provisions of
§

4.1-206.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (b) a subsequent change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016, whether by transfer, acquisition, inheritance, or other means. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may expand any existing building or structure and the uses thereof so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may construct a new building or structure so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. All such licensees shall comply with the requirements of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and Board regulations for renewal of such license or the issuance of a new license in the event of a change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 8, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That on or after July 1, 2020, the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may issue mixed beverage carrier licenses to persons operating a common carrier of passengers by bus, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages anywhere in the Commonwealth to passengers while in transit aboard any such common carrier. The state license fee for any such license granted prior to January 1, 2022, shall be $190. Such license shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license. For the purposes of this enactment, ‘bus’ means a motor vehicle that (i) is operated by a common carrier licensed under Chapter 20 ( §

46.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 46.2 of the Code of Virginia to transport passengers for compensation over the highways of the Commonwealth on regular or irregular routes of not less than 100 miles, (ii) seats no more than 24 passengers, (iii) is 40 feet in length or longer, (iv) offers wireless Internet services, (v) is equipped with charging stations at every seat for cellular phones or other portable devices, and (vi) during the transportation of passengers, is staffed by an attendant who has satisfied all training requirements set forth in Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia or Board regulation.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 390 and 391, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “Designated outdoor refreshment area license, $300. However, for any designated outdoor refreshment area license issued pursuant to a local ordinance, the annual fee shall be $3,000” for “Local special events license” in subdivision A 6 b (3).

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 78 and 79 are identical, and added subdivision A 8 f; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 589 and 590 are identical, and inserted “casinos” in subdivision A 3 a; and rewrote subdivision A 3 c, which read: “Mixed beverage restaurant license for restaurants located on the premises of and operated by a casino gaming establishment, $3,100 plus an additional $5 for each gaming station located on the premises of the casino gaming establishment.” and added the second sentence.

§ 4.1-232.
Refund of state license tax.

The Board may correct erroneous assessments made by it against any person and make refunds of any amounts collected pursuant to erroneous assessments, or collected as taxes on licenses, which are subsequently refused or application therefor withdrawn, and to allow credit for any license taxes paid by any licensee for any license that is subsequently merged or changed into another license during the same license period. No refund shall be made of any such amount, however, unless made within three years from the date of collection of the same.

In any case where a licensee has changed its name or form of organization during a license period without any change being made in its ownership, and because of such change is required to pay an additional license tax for such period, the Board shall refund to such licensee the amount of such tax so paid in excess of the required license tax for such period.

The Board shall make refunds, prorated according to a schedule of its prescription, to licensees of state license taxes paid pursuant to subsection A of §

4.1-231.1

if the place of business designated in the license is destroyed by an act of God, including but not limited to fire, earthquake, hurricane, storm, or similar natural disaster or phenomenon.

Any amount required to be refunded under this section shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of moneys appropriated to the Board and in the manner prescribed in §

4.1-116

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 4-33, 4-35; 1952, c. 535; 1960, c. 476; 1970, c. 627; 1972, c. 717; 1974, c. 267; 1976, c. 496; 1978, c. 190; 1980, cc. 524, 526; 1982, cc. 66, 527; 1984, cc. 180, 559; 1986, c. 190; 1990, cc. 300, 390, 707; 1991, c. 425; 1992, c. 350; 1993, c. 866; 2011, c. 728; 2015, c. 412; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 728, effective March 26, 2011, added subsection C, redesignated former subsection C as subsection D, and made a minor stylistic change therein.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 412 substituted “period” for “year” throughout the section and substituted “that” for “which” in subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and substituted “§

4.1-231.1

” for “§

4.1-231

” in subsection C.

§ 4.1-233.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 1113 and 1114, cl. 2, effective January 1, 2022.

History.

Former §

4.1-233

, relating to taxes on local licenses, was derived from Code 1950, § 4-38; 1952, c. 535; 1968, c. 609, § 4-98.19; 1970, cc. 627, 734; 1972, c. 691; 1974, c. 460; 1975, c. 483; 1976, c. 496; 1978, c. 190; 1982, cc. 66, 527; 1984, c. 180; 1990, c. 707; 1992, cc. 162, 350; 1993, c. 866; 1995, cc. 497, 518; 1996, cc. 584, 596, 604; 1998, cc. 489, 535; 1999, c. 325; 2000, cc. 1036, 1047, 1051; 2001, cc. 461, 845; 2004, cc. 384, 487; 2005, cc. 784, 911; 2006, c. 737; 2007, cc. 101, 107, 295; 2008, c. 198; 2011, c. 626; 2012, cc. 203, 237; 2013, c. 479; 2014, cc. 510, 637; 2015, cc. 348, 695; 2017, cc. 152, 157, 159, 492; 2018, cc. 173, 334, 665; 2019, cc. 622, 628; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 390, 391.

Cross references.

For current provisions related to fees on local licenses, see §

4.1-233.1

.